liblouis/share/liblouis/tables/_translation_zh-TW-g0.ctb
always \x91cd\x4e5d 12-12346-2-13-234-4
always \x91cd\x4f30 12-12346-2-13-34-3
always \x91cd\x4f86 12-12346-2-14-2456-2
always \x91cd\x4fee 12-12346-2-15-234-3
always \x91cd\x5144 12-12346-2-15-235-3
always \x91cd\x5149 12-12346-2-13-456-3
always \x91cd\x5165 12-12346-2-1245-34-5
always \x91cd\x520a 12-12346-2-123-1236-3
always \x91cd\x5370 12-12346-2-1456-5
always \x91cd\x56de 12-12346-2-1235-1246-2
always \x91cd\x570d 12-12346-2-1246-2
always \x91cd\x594f 12-12346-2-125-12356-5
always \x91cd\x5a5a 12-12346-2-1235-123456-3
always \x91cd\x5b6b 12-12346-2-15-123456-3
always \x91cd\x5b9a 12-12346-2-145-13456-5
always \x91cd\x5beb 12-12346-2-15-346-4
always \x91cd\x5efa 12-12346-2-13-2345-5
always \x91cd\x5fa9 12-12346-2-12345-34-5
always \x91cd\x6176 12-12346-2-245-13456-5
always \x91cd\x6284 12-12346-2-12-146-3
always \x91cd\x632f 12-12346-2-1-136-5
always \x91cd\x6574 12-12346-2-1-1356-4
always \x91cd\x65b0 12-12346-2-15-1456-3
always \x91cd\x6d0b 12-12346-2-46-2
always \x91cd\x6e2c 12-12346-2-245-2346-5
always \x91cd\x6f14 12-12346-2-2345-4
always \x91cd\x7372 12-12346-2-1235-25-5
always \x91cd\x73fe 12-12346-2-15-2345-5
always \x91cd\x7533 12-12346-2-24-136-3
always \x91cd\x758a 12-12346-2-145-346-2
always \x91cd\x7d44 12-12346-2-125-34-4
always \x91cd\x7f6e 12-12346-2-1-156-5
always \x91cd\x8003 12-12346-2-123-146-4
always \x91cd\x8907 12-12346-2-12345-34-5
always \x91cd\x8a2d 12-12346-2-24-2346-5
always \x91cd\x8e48 12-12346-2-145-146-5
always \x91cd\x8fd4 12-12346-2-12345-1236-4
always \x91cd\x8ff0 12-12346-2-24-34-5
always \x91cd\x9022 12-12346-2-12345-1356-2
always \x91cd\x91cd 12-12346-2-12-12346-2
always \x91cd\x967d 12-12346-2-46-2
always \x91d1\x5b50 13-1456-3-125-156-1
always \x91d8\x5b50 145-13456-3-125-156-1
always \x91e6\x5b50 123-12356-5-125-156-1
always \x9245\x8457 13-1256-5-1-34-5
always \x9257\x5b50 245-2345-2-125-156-1
always \x9264\x5b50 13-12356-3-125-156-1
always \x9280\x5b50 1456-2-125-156-1
always \x9280\x884c 1456-2-1235-1346-2
always \x92b7\x5047 15-246-3-13-23456-5
always \x92ea\x4f4d 1234-34-5-1246-5
always \x92ea\x5b50 1234-34-5-125-156-1
always \x92ea\x9762 1234-34-5-134-2345-5
always \x92f8\x5b50 13-1256-5-125-156-1
always \x9320\x5b50 145-13456-5-125-156-1
always \x934a\x5b50 14-2345-5-125-156-1
always \x934b\x5b50 13-25-3-125-156-1
always \x9397\x5f48 245-46-3-145-1236-5
always \x939a\x5b50 12-1246-2-125-156-1
always \x93ac\x4eac 1235-146-5-13-13456-3
always \x93e1\x5b50 13-13456-5-125-156-1
always \x9435\x9a0e 124-346-4-13-16-5
always \x9470\x5319 246-5-24-156-4
always \x9472\x5d4c 15-46-3-245-2345-5
always \x947d\x6212 125-12456-5-13-346-5
always \x947d\x77f3 125-12456-5-24-156-2
always \x947f\x5b50 125-146-2-125-156-1
always \x9577\x4f7f 1-1346-4-24-156-4
always \x9577\x5047 12-1346-2-13-23456-5
always \x9577\x50cf 1-1346-4-15-46-5
always \x9577\x5144 1-1346-4-15-235-3
always \x9577\x5927 1-1346-4-145-345-5
always \x9577\x5973 1-1346-4-1345-1256-4
always \x9577\x5b50 1-1346-4-125-156-4
always \x9577\x5b6b 1-1346-4-15-123456-3
always \x9577\x5b98 1-1346-4-13-12456-3
always \x9577\x5e7c 1-1346-4-234-5
always \x9577\x623f 1-1346-4-12345-1346-2
always \x9577\x7537 1-1346-4-1345-1236-2
always \x9577\x8001 1-1346-4-14-146-4
always \x9577\x8005 1-1346-4-1-2346-4
always \x9577\x8457 1-1346-4-1-2346-1
always \x9577\x865f 12-1346-2-1235-146-2
always \x9577\x8f29 1-1346-4-135-356-5
always \x9577\x9032 1-1346-4-13-1456-5
always \x9580\x5b50 134-136-2-125-156-1
always \x9580\x6846 134-136-2-123-456-5
always \x9580\x6abb 134-136-2-123-1236-4
always \x9580\x7e2b 134-136-2-12345-1356-5
always \x9589\x585e 135-16-5-15-2346-5
always \x958b\x8869 123-2456-3-12-345-5
always \x9592\x6563 15-2345-2-15-1236-4
always \x9592\x7a7a 15-2345-2-123-12346-5
always \x9593\x63a5 13-2345-5-13-346-3
always \x9593\x65b7 13-2345-5-145-12456-5
always \x9593\x6b47 13-2345-5-15-346-3
always \x9593\x8adc 13-2345-5-145-346-2
always \x9593\x9694 13-2345-5-13-2346-2
always \x9593\x9699 13-2345-5-15-16-5
always \x95a3\x5b50 13-2346-2-125-156-1
always \x95b1\x5377 236-5-13-45-5
always \x95d5\x5931 245-236-3-24-156-3
always \x95d5\x5982 245-236-3-1245-34-2
always \x95d5\x6f0f 245-236-3-14-12356-5
always \x95d5\x7591 245-236-3-16-2
always \x963b\x5687 125-34-4-1235-2346-5
always \x963b\x585e 125-34-4-15-2346-5
always \x963f\x4fd7 2346-3-15-34-2
always \x963f\x8adb 2346-3-1256-2
always \x9644\x548c 12345-34-5-1235-2346-5
always \x9644\x8457 12345-34-5-1-25-2
always \x964d\x4f0f 15-46-2-12345-34-2
always \x964d\x5c07 15-46-2-13-46-5
always \x964d\x6575 15-46-2-145-16-2
always \x964d\x66f8 15-46-2-24-34-3
always \x964d\x670d 15-46-2-12345-34-2
always \x964d\x9f8d 15-46-2-14-12346-2
always \x9662\x5b50 45-5-125-156-1
always \x9662\x9577 45-5-1-1346-4
always \x9663\x5b50 1-136-5-125-156-1
always \x968a\x9577 145-1246-5-1-1346-4
always \x9690\x85cf 1456-4-245-1346-2
always \x96a8\x8208 15-1246-2-15-13456-5
always \x96b1\x6c92 1456-4-134-126-5
always \x96b1\x85cf 1456-4-245-1346-2
always \x96c5\x6a02 23456-4-236-5
always \x96d9\x91cd 24-456-3-12-12346-2
always \x96e2\x9593 14-16-2-13-2345-5
always \x96e3\x5730 1345-1236-5-145-16-5
always \x96e3\x6c11 1345-1236-5-134-1456-2
always \x96e3\x80f8 1345-1236-5-15-235-3
always \x96ea\x8304 15-236-4-13-23456-3
always \x96fb\x710a 145-2345-5-1235-1236-5
always \x9732\x767d 14-12356-5-135-2456-2
always \x9732\x76f8 14-12356-5-15-46-5
always \x9732\x81c9 14-12356-5-14-2345-4
always \x9732\x9762 14-12356-5-134-2345-5
always \x9756\x96e3 13-13456-5-1345-1236-5
always \x975c\x8108 13-13456-5-134-2456-5
always \x975e\x5206 12345-356-3-12345-136-5
always \x975e\x96e3 12345-356-3-1345-1236-5
always \x9762\x5b50 134-2345-5-125-156-1
always \x9774\x5b50 15-236-3-125-156-1
always \x978b\x5b50 15-346-2-125-156-1
always \x978d\x5b50 1236-3-125-156-1
always \x97ff\x61c9 15-46-4-13456-5
always \x9806\x61c9 24-123456-5-13456-5
always \x9818\x5b50 14-13456-4-125-156-1
always \x982d\x5b50 124-12356-2-125-156-1
always \x9838\x5b50 13-13456-4-125-156-1
always \x986f\x8457 15-2345-4-1-34-5
always \x98db\x5f48 12345-356-3-145-1236-5
always \x98db\x6f32 12345-356-3-1-1346-5
always \x9903\x5b50 13-246-4-125-156-1
always \x990a\x5206 46-4-12345-136-5
always \x9918\x8208 1256-2-15-13456-5
always \x9928\x5b50 13-12456-4-125-156-1
always \x9928\x9577 13-12456-4-1-1346-4
always \x9996\x76f8 24-12356-4-15-46-5
always \x9996\x90fd 24-12356-4-145-34-3
always \x9996\x9577 24-12356-4-1-1346-4
always \x99ac\x5b50 134-345-4-125-156-1
always \x99ac\x864e 134-345-4-1235-34-3
always \x99ae\x6cb3 1234-13456-2-1235-2346-2
always \x9a0e\x5175 13-16-5-135-13456-3
always \x9a19\x5b50 1234-2345-5-125-156-1
always \x9a3e\x5b50 14-25-2-125-156-1
always \x9a4d\x9a0e 15-246-3-13-16-5
always \x9a55\x6a6b 13-246-3-1235-1356-5
always \x9aa8\x5b50 13-34-4-125-156-1
always \x9aa8\x76f8 13-34-4-15-46-5
always \x9ad4\x80d6 124-16-4-1234-1236-2
always \x9ad8\x66f4 13-146-3-13-1356-3
always \x9ad8\x8208 13-146-3-15-13456-5
always \x9ad8\x9e97 13-146-3-14-16-2
always \x9b06\x6563 15-12346-3-15-1236-4
always \x9b0d\x5b50 1235-34-2-125-156-1
always \x9b1a\x5b50 15-1256-3-125-156-1
always \x9b3c\x5b50 13-1246-4-125-156-1
always \x9bae\x5c11 15-2345-4-24-146-4
always \x9bae\x6065 15-2345-4-12-156-4
always \x9d28\x5b50 23456-3-125-156-1
always \x9d3b\x722a 1235-12346-2-1-146-4
always \x9d3f\x5b50 13-2346-3-125-156-1
always \x9d60\x7684 1235-34-2-145-16-5
always \x9ea5\x5b50 134-2456-5-125-156-1
always \x9ebb\x5b50 134-345-2-125-156-1
always \x9ec3\x51a0 1235-456-2-13-12456-3
always \x9ede\x5b50 145-2345-4-125-156-1
always \x9f13\x8b5f 13-34-4-125-146-5
always \x9f3b\x5b50 135-16-2-125-156-1
always \x9f9c\x8332 245-234-3-245-156-2
always \x9f9c\x88c2 13-256-3-14-346-5
always \x97f3\x6a02 1456-3-236-5
always \x7b56\x5212 245-2346-5-1235-35-5
always \x4e3a\x4e86 1246-5-14-2346-1
always \x7684\x786e 145-16-2-245-236-5
always \x6210\x957f 12-1356-2-1-1346-4
always \x5546\x91cf 24-1346-3-14-46-2
always \x80c6\x5b50 145-1236-4-125-156-1
always \x5e72\x5427 13-1236-5-135-345-1
always \x56e0\x4e3a 1456-3-1246-5
always \x56de\x5e94 1235-1246-2-13456-5
always \x5904\x7406 12-34-4-14-16-4
always \x884c\x85cf 15-13456-2-245-1346-2
always \x4e5d\x91cd 13-234-4-12-12346-2
always \x7ad9\x957f 1-1236-5-1-1346-4
always \x5e97\x94fa 145-2345-5-1234-34-5
always \x5174\x8da3 15-13456-5-245-1256-5
always \x6267\x8457 1-156-2-1-25-2
always \x8ba1\x5212 13-16-5-1235-35-5
